Massachusetts, session 194th, S1893.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 58A of chapter 31 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out, in line
4 the words “position of firefighter or police officer if such person has reached his thirty-second
birthday on the date of the entrance examination” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- , position of firefighter if such person has reached his thirty-second birthday and police
officer if such person has reached his fortieth birthday on the date of the entrance examination.
of 1